Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2805
Ordinances; adoption; procedure.

(1) A municipal county may adopt ordinances, and any such ordinances shall supersede those of any municipality or county consolidated into the municipal county.

(2) All ordinances shall be passed pursuant to such rules and regulations as the council may provide, and all such ordinances may be proved by the certificate of the council. When printed or published in book or pamphlet form and purporting to be published by authority of the municipal county, such ordinances shall be read and received in evidence in all courts and places without further proof. The passage, approval, and publication or posting of an ordinance shall be sufficiently proved by a certificate from the council showing that the ordinance was passed and approved and when and in what newspaper the ordinance was published or when, by whom, and where the ordinance was posted. When ordinances are published in book or pamphlet form, purporting to be published by authority of the council, the same need not be otherwise published, and the book or pamphlet shall be received as evidence of the passage and legal publication of the ordinances, as of the dates mentioned in the book or pamphlet, in all courts without further proof.

Laws 2001, LB 142, § 5.